Wyoming, session 2025, HB0186.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-703(c), 23-2-101(j)(intro) and
23-3-105(a) and by creating a new subsection (d) are
amended to read:

HB0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0449
23-1-703. Limitation of number of certain licenses;
reservation of certain licenses; reservation of certain
unused licenses.

(c) Except as provided in W.S. 23-3-105(d) and except
as provided in this subsection and subsection (f) of this
section or by rule of the commission, no person who is
issued a hunting license on and after July 1, 2022 for a
grizzly bear, or for a mountain goat, any moose or antlered
moose, any ram bighorn sheep, any bighorn sheep and any
wild bison, and no person who, on July 1, 2022, is subject
to the five (5) year restriction under subsection (b) of
this section for a moose or bighorn sheep license, shall be
eligible to apply for or receive a hunting license for that
particular species in any future year. The commission may
issue hunting licenses to any person in future years when
necessary for wildlife management purposes to harvest
grizzly bear, mountain goat, ewe or lamb bighorn sheep or
cow or calf moose. The commission may issue hunting
licenses to any person to harvest cow or calf wild bison
pursuant to W.S. 23-2-107(f).

HB0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0449
23-2-101. Fees; restrictions; nonresident application
fee; nonresident licenses; verification of residency
required; donation of refunded application fees.

(j) Subject to W.S. 23-1-705(e), 23-2-101(f),
23-1-705(e) and 23-3-105(d) and the applicable fee under
W.S. 23-1-701, the following hunting licenses and tags may
be purchased for the fee indicated and subject to the
limitations provided:

23-3-105. Antelope, deer and elk coupons; payment to
landowner; kill on federal or state land; bear coupons.

(a) Antelope, deer and elk licenses shall have two
(2) coupons attached, each bearing the same serial number
as the body of the permit, one (1) designated "antelope,
deer or elk coupon" and one (1) designated "landowner's
coupon". Each resident elk license may have an additional
coupon attached as provided in subsection (d) of this
section.

(d) Each resident elk license issued for 2026 and
2027 in a hunt area that is entirely outside of the greater
HB0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0449
Yellowstone ecosystem recovery zone as established by the
United States fish and wildlife service shall include a
bear coupon. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the
issuance of a bear coupon for a hunt area that is in whole
or in part within any demographic monitoring area
established outside the greater Yellowstone ecosystem
recovery zone. The bear coupon shall not require an
additional license fee under W.S. 23-2-101(j) and shall not
be considered a license for purposes of W.S. 23-1-703(c). A
bear coupon under this subsection shall only authorize the
holder of the bear coupon to take not more than one (1)
brown or black bear or grizzly bear that is in an area
where the licensee would be authorized to take an elk as
designated by the elk license. If any licensee takes a bear
pursuant to a coupon under this subsection, the licensee
shall:

(i) Attach the bear coupon to the carcass of the
bear as provided in W.S. 23-3-104;

(ii) As soon as practicable, notify the game and
fish commission of the time, place and manner of the taking
of the bear;
HB0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0449

(iii) If the bear is a grizzly bear, provide any
additional information required by the game and fish
commission to ensure that a sustainable population of
grizzly bears is maintained within the Yellowstone recovery
area.

Section 2.

(a) The legislature finds that grizzly bears have
recovered in Wyoming and should be removed from the
endangered species and threatened species list and that the
state should be responsible for management of grizzly bears
in Wyoming.

(b) Not later than July 1, 2025 and prior to issuing
any bear coupon in accordance with W.S. 23-3-105(d) as
created by section 1 of this act, the game and fish
commission shall present all evidence to the United States
fish and wildlife service supporting the fact that grizzly
bears have recovered in Wyoming and should be removed from
the endangered species and threatened species list and that
HB0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0449
the state should be responsible for management of grizzly
bears in Wyoming.

(c) Nothing in this act shall be deemed to allow any
taking of grizzly bears within the greater Yellowstone
ecosystem recovery zone as established by the United States
fish and wildlife service.

Section 3. The Wyoming game and fish commission shall
adopt any rules necessary to implement this act not later
than January 1, 2026.

HB0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0449
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective on the earlier
of the following dates:

(i) Ten (10) days after the date that the
Wyoming game and fish commission certifies to the secretary
of state that grizzly bears have been removed from the
endangered species and threatened species list;

(ii) January 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0186